src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow Glide after non-glides"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Glide:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* й ] ] _ ;

!"Disallow VLoss after non-U2I2"
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!VLoss:0 /<= [[ :* [ Letters | А1: | %{АЯ%}: | %{ИЫЙ%}: | К1:  | %{ЬØ%}: | %{гк%}: | %{вгк%}: | К3:  ] ] - [ :* [ У2: | И2: ] ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow Devoice between non-d and t"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
%^Devoice: /<=  [Letters: - [ д:т ] ] (ь) _ %> т ;

!"Disallow translative linking vowel vs no linking vowel "
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! k:k /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :*  к ]] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с  ;
!          к  %>  _ с  ;

"Disallow овок"
!! **@RULENAME@**
в:в /<=
    	[Cns|Vows] [б|в|г|д|ж|з|й:|л|м|н|п|р|х|ц|ш|щ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;
    	%> [с |т|%{ЕОØ%}: с т|%{ЕОØ%}: ц|%{ЕОØ%}: н|%{ЕОØ%}: н ь к о н ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;

"Disallow Онга"
!! **@RULENAME@**
н:н /<=
    	%> [ш к а] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ г а ;
        %{ЕОØ%}: _ к %> (н) %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;
        %{ЕОØ%}: _ %> н г %{АЕ%}: ;
       [ Cns| с | н е] %> _ г %{АЕ%}: ; !Pl+Nom+Def/PxSg1
!        %{ЕОØ%}: _ [ к|т ] %> (н) %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;
!!$ куд>{ЕОØ}нз{АО}>{ЕОØ}н>нг{АЕ}
!!$ куд>онзо>0н>нга

"Disallow -кс: нетькскс"
!! **@RULENAME@**
к:к /<=
       к с %> _ с ;
       к [Cns - с] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
       [Vows|Cns - [с|ц|ш|ч|д|т]] (ь:) %> %{ЕО%}: %> ш _ а ;
       Vows %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
!       [Cns - [т|к|п|с]] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: в о _ ;

"Disallow -гя only after a few"
!! **@RULENAME@**
я:я /<=
     [[:Vows - [:и]] (%^Я2А:) |[Cns - [й]]|[Cns - [л|н|з|р|д]] ь:] %> г _ [# | %- |%>];
      [Cns - к] %> %{ЕО%}: %{DIM%}: _ ;
      _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: в а ;

"Disallow special imperative in K after vowel stems"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{Х%}:0 /<= Vows %> _ к ;

"Disallow final е lowering to я tag elsewhere"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Е2Я:0 /<= [[:Letters - [:е|е:|%{ЕØ%}:я|%{ЕО%}:я|%{ЕОØ%}:я|%{АЕ%}:я]]|#|%>|:0] _ ;

"Disallow onset vowel after voiced cons"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^PXSG1:0 /<=
     [г|й:|к|п|ф|х|ш|щ|ч|[т|с] (ь:) ] _ %>  н е [%>|# | %- ] ;
     [Vows:|б|в|ж|м|[д|з|л|н|р] (ь:) ] _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: н е [%>|# | %- ] ;

"Disallow Ь2ZERO"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Ь2ZERO:0 /<= [Vows|Cns] _ %> с;

"Disallow ЬKEEP"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^ЬKEEP:0 /<= [Vows|Cns - [ф | т | ц | ч | :с | ш | х]| л ь] _ %> н я ;
              [Vows| Cns | [Cns - [р]] ь ] _ %> [ %{Х%}: | н е | %{ЕОØ%}:] ;
!!TESTS
!echo 'п а н ж:ч > с ы' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'панжемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
!echo 'с и м:п > {Х}:0 {КТ}:т {ЬØ}:ь' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfs
